District of Columbia statutes.
10-511.06

Conveyance of real property for Innerloop Freeway System.

The Architect of the Capitol is authorized to convey to the Mayor of the District of Columbia, for purposes of constructing the Innerloop Freeway System, all, or so much as he determines necessary, of the right, title, and interest of the United States in and to reservations 6B, 6C, 6D, 6E, 6F, and 286 in the District of Columbia. Any real property conveyed under this section shall thereafter be under the sole jurisdiction and control of the Mayor of the District of Columbia.

History

July 21, 1964, 78 Stat. 334, Pub. L. 88-381, § 6

Section References

This section is referenced in § 10-511.03 and § 10-511.05.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 9-140.
1973 Ed., § 9-144.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.